Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2021 Act:
(a) “Board” means the:
(A) State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology;
(B) State Board of Chiropractic Examiners;
(C) State Board of Licensed Social Workers;
(D) Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists;
(E) Oregon Board of Dentistry;
(F) State Board of Massage Therapists;
(G) Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine;
(H) Oregon State Board of Nursing;
(I) Oregon Board of Optometry;
(J) State Board of Pharmacy;
(K) Oregon Medical Board;
(L) Occupational Therapy Licensing Board;
(M) Oregon Board of Physical Therapy;
(N) Oregon Board of Psychology;
(O) Board of Medical Imaging;
(P) Long Term Care Administrators Board;
(Q) State Board of Direct Entry Midwifery;
(R) State Board of Denture Technology;
(S) Respiratory Therapist and Polysomnographic Technologist Licensing Board;
(T) Board of Licensed Dietitians; and
(U) Oregon Health Authority, to the extent that the authority:
(i) Licenses emergency medical services providers under ORS 682.216; and
(ii) Regulates traditional health workers under ORS 414.665.
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Health care provider” means an individual licensed,  certified, registered or otherwise
authorized to practice by a board.
(d) “Health insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 746.600.
Enrolled House Bill 3159 (HB 3159-B) Page 1
(2) At least once each calendar year and in accordance with timelines established by the
authority by rule, a coordinated care  organization, a health care provider or health care
provider’s designee, or a  health insurer shall collect data on race, ethnicity, preferred spoken
and written languages, disability status, sexual  orientation and gender identity from the co-
ordinated care organization’s, health  care provider’s or health insurer’s patients, clients and
members, in  accordance with standards adopted by the authority pursuant to ORS 413.161.
A coordinated care organization, health care provider  or health insurer shall submit the data
to the authority in the manner prescribed by the authority by rule.
(3)(a) The authority shall adopt rules, including but not limited to rules:
(A) Establishing standards for collecting, securely transmitting and reporting  the data
described in subsection (2) of this section;
(B) Establishing the timelines for collection and submission of data described  in sub-
section (2) of this section;
(C) Permitting coordinated care organizations, health care providers and  health insurers
to report to  the authority that a patient, client or member refused to answer questions re-
garding race,  ethnicity, preferred spoken and written languages, disability status, sexual
orientation and gender identity;
(D) Establishing criteria for extensions  of timelines established under this subsection and
a process for reviewing requests for extensions; and
(E) Establishing criteria for exempting certain health care providers  or classes of health
care providers from the requirements of  subsection (2) of this section and a process for re-
viewing requests for exemptions.
(b) In adopting rules under subsection (2) of this section, the authority shall:
(A) Consult with the advisory committee established under ORS 413.161;
(B) Allow  coordinated care organizations, health care providers and health insurers to
collect the data described in subsection (2) of this section on electronic or paper forms; and
(C) Require coordinated care organizations, health care providers and health  insurers to
inform patients, clients and members:
(i) That data collected under subsection (2) of this section is reported to the authority;
(ii) How the authority, coordinated care organization, health care provider and health
insurer use the data;
(iii) Of the purposes for which the data may not be used; and
(iv) That the patient, client  or member is not required to answer questions regarding
race, ethnicity, preferred spoken and  written languages, disability status, sexual orientation
and gender identity.
(4) Data collected under  this section is confidential and not subject to disclosure under
ORS 192.311 to 192.478. The  authority may release the data collected under this section only
if the data to be released is  anonymized and aggregated so that the data released does not
reasonably allow an individual whose information is included in the data to be identified.
(5) A coordinated care organization or health insurer transacting insurance in  this state
may not consider any data collected under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) In  determining whether to deny, limit, cancel, rescind or refuse to renew an insur-
ance policy;
(b) To establish premium rates for an insurance policy; or
(c) To establish the terms and conditions of an insurance policy.
(6) The authority may provide incentives to  coordinated care organizations, health care
providers and health insurers to  assist in deferring the costs of making changes to electronic
health records systems or similar systems to facilitate  the collection of data described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(7)(a) The authority shall monitor coordinated care organizations, health  care providers
and health insurers for compliance with  the standards established under subsection (1) of
this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3159 (HB 3159-B) Page 2
(b) The authority may impose on a coordinated care organization,  health care provider
or health insurer  a civil penalty for a violation of the requirements of this section or rules
adopted under this section:
(A) Not to exceed $200 for the first violation;
(B) Not to exceed $400 for the second violation; and
(C) Not to exceed $500 for the third and subsequent violations.
(c) Prior to imposing a penalty  under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the authority shall
provide notice  to the coordinated care organization, health care provider or health insurer
of the alleged violation and  provide the coordinated care organization, health care provider
or health insurer a reasonable time in which to correct the violation.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a data system for data on race,
ethnicity, preferred spoken and written languages, disability  status, sexual orientation and
gender identity collected under section  1 of this 2021 Act. The data system established under
this section must include:
(1) A data registry to receive and store the data described in this section  from coordi-
nated care organizations, health care providers and health insurers,  patients, clients and
members of coordinated care organizations, health care  providers and health insurers, the
authority and the Department of Human Services. The registry  must allow for coordinated
care organizations, health care providers and health insurers to:
(a) Electronically submit data collected under section 1 of this 2021 Act; and
(b) Query the data registry to determine whether the  registry contains current data for
a patient, member or client.
(2) Functionality that allows a patient, member or client to  directly submit to the data
system their data described in this section.
SECTION 3.
No later than June 1, 2022, and every two  years thereafter, the Oregon
Health Authority  shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislative Assembly in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on  the implementation of sections 1 and 2 of this 2021
Act. The report must include, but is not limited to:
(1) A description of uniform standards for  data collection and implementation of the
standards; and
(2) The challenges to  implementing the standards and plan for addressing the challenges.
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop and  administer a grant pro-
gram to provide funding for the purpose of supporting safe data collection  by community
health organizations and community-based groups with  demonstrated experience serving
tribal communities,  communities of color, LGBTQ+ people, people with disabilities, people
who speak primary languages other than English and  other underserved populations. An
entity described in this subsection that receives a grant under this section shall  provide
culturally responsive, trauma-informed trainings  on the collection of the data described in
section 1 (2) of this 2021 Act.
(2) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 413.161 is amended to read:
413.161. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, in  collaboration with the Department of Human Ser-
vices,  shall  adopt by rule uniform standards, based on local, statewide and national best practices,
for the collection of data on race, ethnicity, preferred spoken and  written languages [ and], disability
status, sexual orientation and gender identity . The authority  and the department shall use the
standards, to the greatest extent practicable, in surveys conducted and in all programs in which the
authority or the department collects, records or reports [ such] the data described in this sub-
section. The authority and the department  shall review and update the standards at least once ev-
ery two years to ensure  that the standards are efficient, uniform and consistent with best practices.
(2) The authority shall  appoint an advisory committee in accordance with ORS 183.333 composed
of individuals likely to be affected by the standards and advocates for  individuals likely to be af-
fected by the standards.
Enrolled House Bill 3159 (HB 3159-B) Page 3
SECTION 6. Sections 40, 41 and 43, chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special  session),
are repealed on January 1, 2023.
SECTION 7. (1) Not later than the  operative date specified in section 11 (1) of this 2021
Act, the Oregon Health Authority shall  establish a date by which a coordinated care organ-
ization, health care provider and health insurer, as those terms are defined in  section 1 of
this 2021 Act, shall begin collecting and reporting the data described in section 1 (2) of this
2021 Act.
(2) The authority may not impose a civil penalty on a coordinated care  organization,
health care provider or health insurer until the authority has established a process  for sub-
mission of  the data described in section 1 (2) of this 2021 Act and the data system described
in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (En-
rolled House Bill 5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for  central services, state
assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $9,768,195,  for the purposes of carry-
ing out sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2,  chapter __, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for
central services, state assessments and  enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $5,624,767, for
the purposes of carrying out sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (3), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House  Bill
5024), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding  federal funds described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5024), collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
central services, state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is  increased by $2,842,387, for
the purposes of carrying out sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. (1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments  to ORS 413.161 by section 5 of this 2021 Act become operative on
July 1, 2022.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by sections 1 to 4  of this 2021 Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 413.161 by section 5 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3159 (HB 3159-B) Page 4
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3159 (HB 3159-B) Page 5